Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-294
Uniform Partnership Act of 1998; applicability.

In any case not provided for in the Nebraska Uniform Limited Partnership Act, the Uniform Partnership Act of 1998 shall govern.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 62;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 61;

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 70;

Laws 2008, LB707, § 1.
July 18, 2008
Uniform Partnership Act of 1998, see section 67-401.